Utah statutes.
59-2-103.5.   Procedures to obtain an exemption for residential property.

(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, a county legislative body may by ordinance require that in order for residential property to be allowed a residential exemption in accordance with Section 59-2-103, an owner of the residential property shall file with the county board of equalization a statement:

(a)  on a form prescribed by the commission by rule;

(b)  signed by all of the owners of the residential property;

(c)  certifying that the residential property is residential property; and

(d)  containing other information as required by the commission by rule.

(2) (a)  Subject to Section 59-2-103 and except as provided in Subsection (3), a county board of equalization shall allow an owner described in Subsection (1) a residential exemption for the residential property described in Subsection (1) if:

(i)  the county legislative body enacts the ordinance described in Subsection (1); and

(ii)  the county board of equalization determines that the requirements of Subsection (1) are met.

(b)  A county board of equalization may require an owner of the residential property described in Subsection (1) to file the statement described in Subsection (1) only if:

(i)  that residential property was ineligible for the residential exemption authorized under Section 59-2-103 during the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the owner is seeking to claim the residential exemption for that residential property;

(ii)  an ownership interest in that residential property changes; or

(iii)  the county board of equalization determines that there is reason to believe that that residential property no longer qualifies for the residential exemption in accordance with Section 59-2-103.

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), if a county legislative body does not enact an ordinance requiring an owner to file a statement in accordance with this section, the county board of equalization:

(a)  may not require an owner to file a statement for residential property to be eligible for a residential exemption in accordance with Section 59-2-103; and

(b)  shall allow a residential exemption for residential property in accordance with Section 59-2-103.

(4) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission shall make rules providing:

(i)  the form for the statement described in Subsection (1); and

(ii)  the contents of the form for the statement described in Subsection (1).

(b)  The commission shall make the form described in Subsection (4)(a) available to counties.

